Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1810
Inquest; verdict of murder or manslaughter; effect.

The verdict of the coroner's jury, charging any person with murder or manslaughter, shall have the same force and effect as the finding of a bill of indictment by the grand jury, until the case shall have been investigated by a grand jury, and they shall have made their return thereon.

Laws 1879, § 115, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 5672;

C.S.1922, § 5002;

C.S.1929, § 26-1511;

R.S.1943, § 23-1810.